Hawaii statutes.
§480E-11 Unfair or deceptive act or
practice; penalties. (a) Any person who violates any provision of
this chapter shall be deemed to have engaged in an unfair or deceptive act or
practice in the conduct of any trade or commerce within the meaning of section
480-2.

(b) Any person who violates any provision of
title 12 Code of Federal Regulations part 1015, pertaining to mortgage
assistance relief services, shall be deemed to have engaged in an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in the conduct of any trade or commerce within the
meaning of section 480-2.

(c) The penalties provided in this section
shall be cumulative to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws
of this State. [L 2008, c 137, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 183, §2; am L 2016, c
142, §10]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next